Utah statutes.
48-2a-206.   Filing with the division.

(1)  An original and one copy of the certificate of limited partnership, and of any certificates of amendment or cancellation, or of any judicial decree of amendment or cancellation, shall be delivered to the division.  A person who executes a certificate as an attorney-in-fact or fiduciary need not exhibit evidence of the person’s authority as a prerequisite to filing.  Unless the division finds that any certificate does not conform to law as to its form, upon receipt of all filing fees established under Section 63J-1-504, it shall:

(a)  place on the original and the copy a stamp or seal indicating the time, day, month, and year of the filing, the director of the division's signature, and the division's seal, or facsimiles thereof, and the name of the division;

(b)  file the signed original in its office; and

(c)  return the stamped copy to the person who filed it or the person’s representative.

(2)  The stamped copy of the certificate of limited partnership and of any certificate of amendment or cancellation shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required for the formation, amendment, or cancellation of a limited partnership have been complied with and the limited partnership has been formed, amended, or canceled under this chapter, except with respect to an action for involuntary cancellation of the limited partnership's certificate for fraud under Subsection 48-2a-203.5(1)(a).

(3)  Upon the filing of a certificate of amendment or judicial decree of amendment with the division, the certificate of limited partnership is amended as set forth in the certificate of amendment or judicial decree of amendment, and upon filing a certificate of cancellation, or of a judicial decree of cancellation, the division shall cancel the certificate of limited partnership effective as of the date the cancellation was filed or as of the date specified in the decree, unless a later effective date is specified in the cancellation.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

